District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.06

Notice.

(a)

A copy of an environmental covenant shall be provided by the persons designated by the agency and in the manner required by the environmental agency to:

(1)

Each person that signed the covenant;

(2)

Each person holding a recorded interest in the real property subject to the covenant;

(3)

Each person in possession of the real property subject to the covenant;

(4)

Each municipality or other unit of local government in which real property subject to the covenant is located; and

(5)

Any other person the environmental agency requires.

(b)

The validity of a covenant is not affected by failure to provide a copy of the covenant as required under this section.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 106, 53 DCR 1652
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.